Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.150

Operating without license—Penalty.

Any person operating or maintaining any nursing home without a license under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and each day of a continuing violation after conviction shall be considered a separate offense.

[ 1951 c 117 s 16.]